Wyoming, session 2025, HB0094.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-3-302.2 by creating a new
subsection (k) is amended to read:
21-3-302.2. Wyoming charter school authorizing board;
number of charter schools that may be authorized.
(k) Beginning on July 1, 2025 and notwithstanding any
other provision of law, the Wyoming charter school
authorizing board may authorize any number of charter
schools in accordance with the requirements of this
article.
Section 2. 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 179,
Section 4(b) is amended to read:
Section 4.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of
the law, not more than three (3) four (4) charter
schools shall be authorized to operate by an
entity other than a school district board, prior
to July 1, 2026 July 1, 2025. The three (3)
charter schools authorized by the state loan and
investment board shall count towards the three
(3) four (4) schools authorized to operate under
this subsection. In the event a charter school
previously authorized by the state loan and
investment board closes for any reason, the
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0094
ENROLLED ACT NO. 47, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Wyoming charter school authorizing board may
approve a new charter school.
Section 3. 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 179,
Section 4(c) is repealed.
Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2